Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-132
Assessments; equalization; notice.

On or before May 15 in each year the assessor must complete his assessment book and deliver it to the secretary of the board, who must immediately give notice thereof, and of the time the board of directors acting as a board of equalization will meet to equalize assessments, by publication in a newspaper published in each of the counties comprising the district. The time fixed for the meeting shall not be less than ten or more than twenty days from the first publication of the notice; and in the meantime the assessment books must remain in the office of the secretary for the inspection of all persons interested.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 17, p. 282;

Laws 1897, c. 86, § 3, p. 362;

R.S.1913, § 3473;

C.S.1922, § 2873;

C.S.1929, § 46-118;

R.S.1943, § 46-132.